Utah statutes.
76-10-3102.   Legislative findings -- Purpose of act.

The Legislature finds and determines that competition is fundamental to the free market system and that the unrestrained interaction of competitive forces will yield the best allocation of our economic resources, the lowest prices, the highest quality and the greatest material progress, while at the same time providing an environment conducive to the preservation of our democratic, political and social institutions.

The purpose of this act is, therefore, to encourage free and open competition in the interest of the general welfare and economy of this state by prohibiting monopolistic and unfair trade practices, combinations and conspiracies in restraint of trade or commerce and by providing adequate penalties for the enforcement of its provisions.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

